Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 428A.101; and 428A.21, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06970 428A.101 DEADLINE FOR SPECIAL SERVICE DISTRICT UNDER GENERAL LAW. The establishment of a new special service district after June 30, 2028, requires enactment of a special law authorizing the establishment. 428A.21 DEADLINE FOR HOUSING IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS UNDER GENERAL LAW. The establishment of a new housing improvement area after June 30, 2028, requires enactment of a special law authorizing the establishment of the area.